Massachusetts, session 194th, H1938.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 174E of chapter 140, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out in subparts (f) and (g) each instance of the word “dog” and inserting in place thereof
the following word:- “animal”
SECTION 2. Section 174E of chapter 140, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out in subparts (f) each instance of the words “a dog” and inserting in place thereof the
following words:- “an animal”
SECTION 3. Said section 174E of chapter 140 is further amended by inserting after the
subpart (i) the following subpart:-
(j) The commissioner of the department of agricultural resources shall, in consultation
with the Animal Control Officers Association of Massachusetts, Massachusetts Society for the
Prevention of Cruelty to Animals and the Animal Rescue League of Boston, promulgate
regulations to implement, enforce, and administer subparts (f) and (g).
of 1